Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 11 Conservatorship

19-11-1.
Appointment of conservator on application by stockholders or directors.

Whenever any financial institution or credit union shall petition the director for the appointment of a conservator of its property, assets, and affairs for the benefit of its depositors and other creditors, and in order to provide an opportunity for a reorganization of its affairs, the director is authorized and empowered to appoint himself or herself or a deputy a conservator of that financial institution or credit union, the petition in each case to be made in pursuance of a vote adopted by a majority of the board of directors or under the same conditions that could allow the director to petition the court for the appointment of a receiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-2.
Removal of conservator — Vacancies.

If the director, at any time, deems it in the best interest of any financial institution or credit union or its creditors that the conservator appointed pursuant to §

19-11-1

shall be removed from office, the director may so order and may appoint a successor to that office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-3.
Employment of assistance by conservator.

Each conservator, with the approval of the director, may engage legal counsel and procure any other expert assistance and advice that the conservator considers necessary or desirable in the administration of the affairs of the financial institution or credit union, and with the same approval, may engage the employees and retain any of those officers and employees of the financial institution or credit union that he or she deems necessary or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-4.
Possession and management of property — Notice to debtors and persons in possession.

Each conservator, immediately after appointment and qualification, shall take and have possession and management of the property and business of the financial institution or credit union and thereafter shall take any action in the name and behalf of the financial institution or credit union necessary or desirable to carry on its business and to conserve its assets pending reorganization or the disposition of the assets as provided by law, all under the direction and control of the director, or the director’s designee.

Immediately after taking possession of the property and business of the financial institution or credit union, the conservator shall give notice in writing of having taken possession to all persons holding or having possession of any assets of the financial institution or credit union and to all persons indebted to the financial institution or credit union. No financial institution, federally chartered institution, credit union, federal credit union, association, firm, or individual, having been notified of the appointment of the conservator or otherwise having knowledge of his or her appointment, shall have or acquire any lien or charge upon or against any of the property of the financial institution or credit union for any payment, advance, or clearance or any obligation thereafter made or incurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-5.
Creditors’ rights as in receivership.

During the time that any conservator remains in charge of the property and affairs of any financial institution or credit union in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the rights of creditors and all other parties in respect to bringing and prosecuting suits and proceedings against the financial institution or credit union and the conservator, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, shall be the same as if the conservator was a receiver of the property and affairs of that financial institution or credit union duly appointed and qualified in and by appropriate judicial proceedings instituted for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-6.
Collection of assets — Continuation of business — General powers of conservator.

Each conservator, upon the terms and conditions and in accordance with the orders, rules and regulations, general and special, prescribed from time to time by the director, or the director’s designee, shall, so far as possible, collect all moneys and other assets due and payable to the financial institution or credit union and do all acts necessary to continue its business and to conserve its assets, and may sell or compound bad or doubtful claims and demands due to the financial institution or credit union.

With the written authorization of the director, or the director’s designee, a conservator may, at any time, in the name and upon the credit of the financial institution or credit union, borrow money for any purpose and pledge and deliver to the lender the whole or any part of the property and assets of the financial institution or credit union as security for the repayment of any loan, and may sell all or any part of the real and personal property and other assets of the financial institution or credit union, and in the name of the financial institution or credit union, may take mortgages on real property from purchasers to secure the whole or part of the purchase price.

The conservator may prosecute and defend suits and other proceedings at law and in equity to which the financial institution or credit union is a party.

The conservator may execute, acknowledge, and deliver deeds, assignments, mortgages, releases, promissory notes, and other instruments that the conservator may consider necessary, proper, and desirable to effectuate any sales, pledges, or mortgages of real or personal property and any obligation to repay loans, any compromise, and any other transaction that may be performed or entered into by the conservator under the powers and authority that may be conferred upon him or her. All deeds and other instruments, so executed and delivered, shall be valid and effectual for all purposes to the same extent and with the same effect as if executed by officers of the financial institution or credit union by authority of its board of directors or stockholders.

In addition to all powers and authority and duties specifically mentioned and provided in this chapter, each conservator shall have and exercise all the powers and authority and perform the duties that the director, by either general or special orders, shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-7.
Penalties and liabilities.

The conservator and the conservator’s assistants shall be subject to the same penalties and liabilities to which they would be liable if the conservator were the receiver of a financial institution or credit union appointed in judicial proceedings in this state, including penalties and liabilities now established and which may be established by law. The conservator’s liability shall be limited to the assets of the financial institution or credit union except for fraud or malpractice by the conservator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-8.
Withdrawal of deposits and claims.

During the period of the continuance of any conservatorship provided for, the director, or the director’s designee, may require the conservator to set aside and make available for withdrawal, and permit withdrawal by depositors and other creditors, any amounts or proportions of their respective deposits or claims as the director, or the director’s designee, may order and direct. The director, or the director’s designee, may authorize the conservator in any case to receive and permit withdrawals of new deposits, subject to any rules, regulations, limitations, and dispositions as the director, or the director’s designee, shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-9.
Rules as to new deposits.

Whenever the period of conservatorship provided for in this chapter has been terminated and the financial institution or credit union is permitted to resume business in accordance with this chapter, or whenever a receiver of the property of the financial institution or credit union has been appointed in accordance with law, the new deposits that may have been received shall be disposed of or held for the persons entitled to them in any manner that the director, or the director’s designee, shall prescribe, unless and except as the persons entitled to those deposits have withdrawn the deposits within fifteen (15) days after the conservator has given written notice to them of the opportunity to withdraw those deposits. The conservator shall give this written notice and opportunity at any time and in any manner that the director, or the director’s designee, shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-10.
Payment of expense of conservatorship.

The compensation of the conservator and of legal counsel, assistants, and other employees of the conservator and all other expenses incident to each conservatorship, including costs and expenses incurred by the director, or the director’s designee, in relation to the conservatorship, shall be fixed by the director, or the director’s designee, and paid from and out of the assets of the financial institution or credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-11.
Termination of conservatorship.

If the director, or the director’s designee, shall at any time be satisfied that the further continuance of any conservatorship is no longer necessary or desirable, the director, or the director’s designee, may terminate the conservatorship and direct the conservator to surrender possession of all property then in the conservator’s possession to the financial institution or credit union, and permit it to resume business, all upon the terms, conditions, restrictions, and limitations as the director, or the director’s designee, may prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-12.
Superseding receivership.

Nothing in this chapter, and no appointment or continuance of a conservator under this chapter, shall abridge or affect, or be so construed as to abridge or affect, the right, power, and authority of the director, or the director’s designee, at any time to institute proceedings in accordance with law for the appointment of a receiver of any financial institution or credit union, or of the judicial authority to make appointment of a receiver upon request of the director, or the director’s designee, and if a receiver shall be appointed in this proceeding, the conservator, whenever the receiver shall have been appointed and qualified, shall immediately transfer and deliver to the receiver all property, books, and documents of all kinds then belonging to the financial institution or credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.

19-11-13.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 49.